Illinois, session 104th, SB2616.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $2,000,000, or as much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Department of Agriculture to be used as a 7grant to an Illinois higher education institution's integrated 8bioprocessing research laboratory for the expansion of 9alternative protein research. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.